Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6954HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2761 Section 1. Section 321.189, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. Gold star status. A licensee who is 3 the surviving spouse, parent, child, or sibling of a deceased 4 member of the United States armed forces who died while 5 serving on active duty during a time of military conflict or 6 who died as a result of such service may request that the 7 license be marked to reflect the licenseeâs gold star status. 8 Upon receipt of such a request and satisfactory proof of 9 eligibility, the department shall issue a license with the 10 phrase âGOLD STAR FAMILYâ marked prominently on the face of the 11 license. 12 Sec. 2. Section 321.190, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 13 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 14 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (05) Upon receipt of a request 15 and satisfactory proof of eligibility, a nonoperatorâs 16 identification card issued to a person who is the surviving 17 spouse, parent, child, or sibling of a deceased member of the 18 United States armed forces who died while serving on active 19 duty during a time of military conflict or who died as a result 20 of such service, must contain the same information as any other 21 nonoperatorâs identification card except the phrase âGOLD STAR 22 FAMILYâ must appear prominently on the face of the card. 23